test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-6-wingkwe_gt-norm.yaml
#Past participle, plural object
    виӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg1: [виманум, вимананум]
    виӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg2: [виман, вима̄нын]
    виӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg3: [вима̄нэ, вимана̄нэ]
    виӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu1: [виманаме̄н, вимананме̄н]
    виӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu2: [виманн, виманы̄н, вимананы̄н]
    виӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu3: [виманэ̄н, вимананэ̄н]
    виӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl1: [виманув, виманӯв, вимананув, вимананӯв]
    виӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl2: [виманы̄н, вимананы̄н]
    виӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl3: [вима̄ныл, вимана̄ныл]

#Gerund
    виӈкве+V+Ger: воим
    виӈкве+V+Ger+PxSg1: воимам
    виӈкве+V+Ger+PxSg2: воиман
    виӈкве+V+Ger+PxSg3: [воима, воиматэ]
    виӈкве+V+Ger+PxDu1: воимаме̄н
    виӈкве+V+Ger+PxDu2: воиман
    виӈкве+V+Ger+PxDu3: воимаг
    виӈкве+V+Ger+PxPl1: воимав
    виӈкве+V+Ger+PxPl2: воиман
    виӈкве+V+Ger+PxPl3: воимат

#Privative
    виӈкве+V+VAbess: выгтал
